Vermont, session 2025-2026, H567.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Unclaimed Property * * *
Sec. 1. 27 V.S.A. § 1492 is amended to read:
§ 1492. CONTENT OF REPORT
(a) The report required under section 1491 of this title must:
(1) be signed by or on behalf of the holder and verified as to its
completeness and accuracy;
(2) if filed electronically, be in a secure format approved by the
Administrator that protects confidential information of the apparent owner in
the same manner as required of the Administrator and the Administrator’s
agent under subchapter 14 of this chapter;
(3) describe the property;
(4) except for a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument,
contain the name, if known; last-known address, if known; and Social Security
number or taxpayer identification number, if known or readily ascertainable, of
the apparent owner of property with a value of $50.00 or more;
(5) for an amount held or owing under a life, medical, or endowment
insurance policy or annuity contract, contain the name and last-known address
of the insured, annuitant, or other apparent owner of the policy or contract and
of the beneficiary, as well as any explanation of benefit numbers;
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 2 of 34
2026
* * *
Sec. 2. 27 V.S.A. § 1543 is amended to read:
§ 1543. EXPENSES AND SERVICE CHARGES OF ADMINISTRATOR
Before making a deposit of funds received under this chapter to the General
Fund, the Administrator may deduct:
(1) expenses of disposition of property delivered to the Administrator
under this chapter;
(2) costs of mailing and publication in connection with property
delivered to the Administrator under this chapter;
(3) reasonable service charges;
(4) expenses incurred in examining records of or collecting property
from a putative holder or holder; and
(5) property valued at $100.00 $150.00 or less more than 10 years after
the abandoned property was received from the holder under subchapter 6 of
this chapter shall be paid by the.
(A) The Administrator shall deposit funds deducted under this
subdivision (5) into the Vermont Retirement Security Fund created by 3
V.S.A. § 534 up to a maximum annual total of $300,000.00.
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (5), in the
Administrator’s sole discretion, funds deducted under this subdivision (5) may
be deposited into the Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund
created by 16 V.S.A. § 2885 under authority of this subdivision, provided that
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 3 of 34
2026
not more than a combined total of $300,000.00 shall be deposited into the
Funds in a given year.
(C) For purposes of this subdivision, the value of the abandoned
property shall be that value as of the date the property was received from the
holder by the Administrator.
Sec. 3. 27 V.S.A. § 1543(5) is amended to read:
(5) property valued at $150.00 or less more than 10 years after the
abandoned property was received from the holder under subchapter 6 of this
chapter.
(A) The Administrator shall deposit funds deducted under this
subdivision (5) into the Vermont Retirement Security Fund created by 3
V.S.A. § 534 Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund created by
16 V.S.A. § 2885 up to a maximum annual total of $300,000.00.
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (5), in the
Administrator’s sole discretion, funds deducted under this subdivision (5) may
be deposited into the Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund
created by 16 V.S.A. § 2885, provided that not more than a combined total of
$300,000.00 shall be deposited into the Funds in a given year. [Repealed.]
(C) For purposes of this subdivision, the value of the abandoned
property shall be that value as of the date the property was received from the
holder by the Administrator.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 4 of 34
2026
Sec. 4. 27 V.S.A. § 1553 is amended to read:
§ 1553. CLAIM FOR PROPERTY BY PERSON CLAIMING TO BE
OWNER
(a) A person claiming to be the owner of property held under this chapter
by the Administrator may file a claim for the property on a form prescribed by
the Administrator. The claimant must verify the claim as to its completeness
and accuracy.
(b) The Administrator may waive the requirement in subsection (a) of this
section and may pay or deliver property directly to a person if:
(1) the person receiving the property or payment is shown to be the
apparent owner included on a report filed under section 1491 of this title;
(2) the Administrator reasonably believes the person is entitled to
receive the property or payment; and
(3) the property has a value of less than $250.00 1,000.00.
Sec. 5. 27 V.S.A. § 1557 is amended to read:
§ 1557. DECEASED OWNERS; MULTIPLE CLAIMANTS
(a) If the Administrator holds unclaimed property in the name of a
deceased owner, the Administrator may deliver the property as follows:
(1) In the case of an open estate, to the Administrator administrator or
executor.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 5 of 34
2026
(2) In the case of a closed estate and the unclaimed property is valued at
less than $5,000.00 10,000.00, in accordance with the Probate Division of the
Superior Court decree of distribution.
(3) In the absence of an open estate or Probate Division of the Superior
Court decree of distribution, and the unclaimed property is valued at less than
$5,000.00 10,000.00, to the surviving spouse of the deceased owner, or, if
there is no surviving spouse, then to the next of kin according to 14 V.S.A.
§ 314.
(4) In all other cases where the Administrator holds property in the
name of a deceased owner, a probate estate shall be opened by the claimant, or
other interested party, in order to determine the appropriate distribution of the
unclaimed property. Where an estate is opened solely to distribute unclaimed
property under this section, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may
waive any filing fees.
(b) If the Administrator holds unclaimed property valued at $250.00
1,000.00 or less that more than one person owns, the Administrator may
deliver the property as follows:
(1) If the property has been listed on the Administrator’s website for less
than one year, a proportionate share to each of the persons who owns the
property and who files a claim.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 6 of 34
2026
(2) If the property has been listed on the Administrator’s website for a
year or more, to the first person who files a claim and who owns at least a
share of the property.
* * * Vermont State Retirement Systems * * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 488 is amended to read:
§ 488. PAYMENT OF CONTRIBUTIONS
(a) The contributions computed under section 487 of this title together with
a pro rata share of the cost of the administration of the Vermont State
Retirement System based upon the payroll of the employees of the employer
who are members shall be certified by the Retirement Board to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the employer. The amounts so certified shall be a charge against the
employer. The Chief Fiscal Officer shall pay to the State Treasurer the amount
certified by the Retirement Board as payable under the provisions of this
subchapter, and the State Treasurer shall credit such amounts to the Fund of
the Vermont State Retirement System.
(b) Any payments due that are not received within 30 days after the
installment due date set by the Board shall result in a penalty assessment
against the employer at the rate of one percent of the amount due for each
month calculated from the installment due date, provided that the Board may,
in its discretion, waive part or all of said penalty assessment if good cause is
shown. The delinquent payments and penalties thereon may be recovered by
action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the employer liable therefor
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 7 of 34
2026
or may be deducted by or, at the request of the State Treasurer, from any other
monies payable to such employer by the State or any department or agency
thereof.
Sec. 7. PENSION AND BENEFITS FUNDING TASK FORCE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Pension and Benefits Funding Task
Force to review and report on the funding methodologies of the Vermont State
Retirement System and the State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont,
including the State Employees’ Postemployment Benefits Trust Fund and the
Retired Teachers’ Health and Medical Benefits Fund.
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Chair of the House Committee on Appropriations, who shall be
an ex officio member;
(2) the Chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, who shall be
an ex officio member;
(3) the Secretary of Administration or designee;
(4) the State Treasurer or designee;
(5) one member, appointed by the Vermont National Education
Association;
(6) one member, appointed by the Vermont State Employees’
Association; and
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 8 of 34
2026
(7) one member, appointed by the President of the Vermont Troopers’
Association.
(c) Powers and duties.
(1) The Task Force shall review the existing funding schedules and
methodologies for the following retirement systems:
(A) the Vermont State Retirement Fund, 3 V.S.A. § 473;
(B) the State Employees’ Postemployment Benefits Trust Fund,
3 V.S.A. § 479a;
(C) the Vermont Teachers’ Retirement Fund, 16 V.S.A. § 1944; and
(D) the Retired Teachers’ Health and Medical Benefits Fund,
16 V.S.A. § 1944b.
(2) Following the review required by subdivision (1) of this subsection,
the Task Force shall make recommendations about the funding methodologies
of these systems, consistent with actuarial and governmental accounting
standards, with due consideration of the following:
(A) the long-term sustainability of the pension and benefit plans;
(B) the total cost of funding the systems over time;
(C) the predictability and stability of annual actuarially determined
employer contributions;
(D) the impact of any change in funding methodologies on the State’s
credit rating; and
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 9 of 34
2026
(E) best funding practices as recommended by actuaries and
implemented by peer public pension systems.
(3) The Task Force shall not make recommendations on member
benefits, contribution levels, or assumed rates of return.
(d) Assistance.
(1) The Task Force shall have the administrative, technical, legal, and
fiscal assistance of the Office of the State Treasurer, Vermont Pension
Investment Commission, and the Joint Fiscal Office.
(2) The Office of the State Treasurer is authorized to contract for
advisory services for the Task Force from an actuarial and financial expert, as
necessary.
(e) Report. On or before December 15, 2026, the Task Force shall submit a
final report to the General Assembly, the Retirement Board of the Vermont
State Retirement System, and the Board of Trustees of the State Teachers’
Retirement System of Vermont with its findings and any recommendations for
legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The State Treasurer or designee shall be the chair. The Task Force
shall elect a vice chair from among its members at the first meeting.
(2) The Chair shall call the first meeting of the Task Force to occur on
or before June 15, 2026.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 10 of 34
2026
(4) The Task Force shall cease to exist on December 31, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Task Force serving in the member’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than six
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
General Assembly.
(2) Other members of the Task Force who are not State employees shall
be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as
permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than six meetings. These
payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the State Treasurer.
(h) Leave. Public employee members of the Task Force shall be granted
reasonable time by their employer to attend Task Force meetings.
Sec. 8. 3 V.S.A. § 471 is amended to read:
§ 471. RETIREMENT BOARD; MEDICAL BOARD; ACTUARY; RATES
OF CONTRIBUTION; SAFEKEEPING OF SECURITIES
* * *
(f) The Retirement Board shall keep in convenient form such data as shall
be necessary for actuarial valuation of the fund Fund of the Retirement System,
and for checking the experience of the System.
* * *
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 11 of 34
2026
(j) The Retirement Board shall designate an actuary who shall be the
technical advisor of the Board on matters regarding the operation of the Fund
of the Retirement System, and shall perform such other duties as are required
in connection therewith. Immediately after the establishment of the Retirement
System, the Retirement Board shall adopt for the Retirement System such
mortality and service tables as shall be deemed necessary and shall certify the
rates of contribution payable under the provisions of this subchapter.
Beginning July 1, 2023, at least once every three fiscal years following the
establishment of the System, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation
into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and
beneficiaries of the Retirement System, and taking into account the results of
such investigation, the Retirement Board shall adopt for the Retirement System
such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary and shall
certify the rates of contribution payable under the provisions of this
subchapter.
(k) On the basis of such mortality and service tables as the Retirement
Board shall adopt, the actuary shall make annual valuations of the assets and
liabilities of the fund Fund of the Retirement System.
(l) The Commission shall designate from time to time a depositary for the
securities and evidences of indebtedness held in the Fund of the System and
may contract for the safekeeping of securities and evidences of indebtedness
within and without the State of Vermont in such banks, trust companies, and
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 12 of 34
2026
safe-deposit facilities as it shall from time to time determine. The necessary
and incidental expenses of such safekeeping and for service rendered,
including advisory services in investment matters, shall be paid from the
operation expenses of the System as set forth in this chapter. Any agreement
for the safekeeping of securities or evidences of indebtedness shall provide for
the access to such securities and evidences of indebtedness, except securities
loaned pursuant to a securities lending agreement as authorized by subsection
(m) of this section, at any time by the custodian or any authorized agent of the
State for audit or other purposes. [Repealed.]
(m) The Commission may authorize the loan of its securities pursuant to
securities lending agreements that provide for collateral consisting of cash or
securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. government or its agencies equal to
100 percent or more of the market value of the loaned securities. Cash
collateral may be invested by the lending institution in investments approved
by the State Treasurer. Approval of investments shall be made in accordance
with the standard of care established by the prudent investor rule under 9
V.S.A. chapter 147. [Repealed.]
(n) The Board shall review annually the amount of State contribution
recommended by the actuary of the Retirement System as necessary to achieve
and preserve the financial integrity of the fund Fund established pursuant to
section 473 of this title. Based on this review, the Board shall recommend the
amount of State contribution that should be appropriated for the next fiscal
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 13 of 34
2026
year to achieve and preserve the financial integrity of the fund Fund. On or
before November 1 of each year, the Board shall submit this recommendation
to the Governor and the House Committees on Government Operations and
Military Affairs and on Appropriations and the Senate Committees on
Government Operations and on Appropriations. The provisions of 2 V.S.A.
§ 20(d) (expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made
under this subsection.
Sec. 9. 3 V.S.A. § 472 is amended to read:
§ 472. INVESTMENTS; INTEREST RATE; DISBURSEMENTS;
STANDARDS OF CONDUCT
(a) The members of the Vermont Pension Investment Commission
established in chapter 17 of this title shall be the trustees of the Funds created
by this subchapter, 16 V.S.A. chapter 55, and 24 V.S.A. chapter 125, and with
respect to them may invest and reinvest the assets of the Fund, and hold,
purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of the securities and investments in
which the assets of the Fund have been invested and reinvested. Investments
shall be made in accordance with the standard of care established by the
prudent investor rule under 9 V.S.A. chapter 147.
(b) From time to time, the Retirement Board shall set the rate or rates of
regular interest at such percent rate compounded annually as shall be
determined by the Board, such rate to be limited to a minimum of three percent
and a maximum of five percent.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 14 of 34
2026
(c) The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of the Fund of
the Retirement System. All payments from the Fund shall be made by the
State Treasurer or his or her deputy, with approval of the Retirement Board. A
duly attested copy of a resolution of the Retirement Board designating such
persons and bearing on its face specimen signatures of such persons shall be
filed with the State Treasurer as his or her authority for making payments upon
such vouchers. [Repealed.]
(d) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, no trustee and no
employee of the Board or member of the Commission shall have any direct
interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the Commission; nor
shall any trustee or employee of the Board or the Commission, directly or
indirectly, for the trustee or employee personally or as an agent, in any manner
use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are
authorized by the Board or Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee of
the Board or the Commission become an endorser or surety, or in any manner
an obligor, for the monies loaned to or borrowed from the Board. The
Treasurer, with the approval of the Board and the Commission, shall adopt by
rule standards of conduct for trustees and employees of the Board in order to
maintain and promote public confidence in the integrity of the Board. Such
rules shall prohibit trustees and employees from receiving or soliciting any
gift, including meals, alcoholic beverages, travel fare, room and board, or any
other thing of value, tangible or intangible, from any vendor or potential
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 15 of 34
2026
vendor of investment services, management services, brokerage services, and
other services to the Board or Commission.
Sec. 10. 3 V.S.A. § 479a is amended to read:
§ 479a. STATE EMPLOYEES’ POSTEMPLOYMENT BENEFITS TRUST
FUND
(a) Creation. A “State Employees’ Postemployment Benefits Trust Fund”
(Benefits Fund) is hereby created for the purpose of accumulating and
providing reserves to support retiree postemployment benefits for members,
and to make distributions from the Benefits Fund for current and future
postemployment benefits for retirees of the Vermont State Employees’
Retirement System, excluding pensions and benefits otherwise appropriated by
statute and for the payment of reasonable and proper expenses of administering
the Benefits Fund and related benefit plans. The Benefits Fund shall not be
part of the Retirement System but is intended to comply with and be a tax-
exempt governmental trust under Section 115 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended.
* * *
(c) Administration. The Benefits Fund shall be administered by the State
Treasurer. The Treasurer may invest monies in the Benefits Fund in
accordance with the provisions of 32 V.S.A. § 434 or, in the alternative, may
enter into an agreement with the Commission to invest such monies in
accordance with the standards of care established by the prudent investor rule
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 16 of 34
2026
under 14A V.S.A. § 902, in a manner similar to the Commission’s investment
of retirement system monies. All balances in the Benefits Fund at the end of
the fiscal year shall be carried forward. Interest earned shall remain in the
Benefits Fund. The Treasurer’s annual financial report to the Governor and the
General Assembly shall contain an accounting of receipts, disbursements, and
earnings of the Benefits Fund. [Repealed.]
(d) Held in trust. All funds of the Benefits Fund shall be held in one or
more trusts, custodial accounts treated as trusts, or a combination thereof.
Contributions to the Benefits Fund shall be irrevocable, and it shall be
impossible at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities, with respect to
employees and their beneficiaries, for any part of the corpus or income of the
Benefits Fund to be used for or diverted to purposes other than the payment of
retiree postemployment benefits to members and their beneficiaries and
reasonable expenses of administering the Benefits Fund and related benefit
plans. All balances in the Benefits Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be
carried forward. Interest earned shall remain in the Benefits Fund.
* * *
Sec. 11. 3 V.S.A. § 521 is amended to read:
§ 521. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 17 of 34
2026
(4) “Plans” means the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement System, the
Vermont State Employees’ Retirement System, and the Vermont Municipal
Employees’ Retirement System, the Retired Teachers’ Health and Medical
Benefits Fund, and the State Employees’ Postemployment Benefits Trust Fund
pursuant to section sections 472 and 479a of this title, 16 V.S.A. §§ 1943 and
1944b, and 24 V.S.A. § 5063.
Sec. 12. 3 V.S.A. § 522 is amended to read:
§ 522. VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION
* * *
(i) Assistance and expenses.
(1) The Commission may collect proportionally from the funds of the
three retirement systems Plans and any individual municipalities that have
been allowed to invest their retirement funds pursuant to subsection 523(a) of
this title, any expenses incurred that are associated with carrying out its duties,
and any expenses incurred by the Treasurer’s office in support of the
Commission.
(2) The Attorney General shall serve as legal advisor to the
Commission.
Sec. 13. 3 V.S.A. § 523 is amended to read:
§ 523. VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION; DUTIES
(a) General. The Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall serve as
the custodian of the funds and shall be responsible for the investment of the
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 18 of 34
2026
assets of the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement System, the Vermont State
Employees’ Retirement System, and the Vermont Municipal Employees’
Retirement System pursuant to section 472 of this title, 16 V.S.A. § 1943, and
24 V.S.A. § 5063 Plans. The Commission shall strive to maximize total return
on investment, within acceptable levels of risk for public retirement systems, in
accordance with the standards of care established by the prudent investor rule
under 14A V.S.A. § 902 chapter 9. The Commission may, in its discretion,
subject to approval by the Attorney General, also enter into agreements with
municipalities administering their own retirement systems to invest retirement
funds for those municipal pension plans. The State Treasurer shall serve as the
custodian of the funds of all three retirement systems. The Commission may,
in its discretion, also enter into agreements with the State Treasurer to invest
the State Employees’ Postemployment Benefits Trust Fund, established in
section 479a of this title, and the Retired Teachers’ Health and Medical
Benefits Fund, established in 16 V.S.A. § 1944b.
(b) Powers and duties. The Commission shall have the following duties:
(1) Set the following actuarial assumptions:
(A) the investment rate of return;
(B) the inflation rate; and
(C) the smoothing rate method used for the actuarial valuation of
assets and returns.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 19 of 34
2026
(2) Not more than 180 days after the end of each fiscal year, conduct an
asset allocation study that reviews the expected return of each fund Plan’s
assets, including a risk analysis using best practices methodologies to estimate
potential risks to the fund’s each Plan’s asset values over a five-, 10-, and 20-
year period and the remainder of the statutory amortization period. The study
shall be submitted to the House Committee on Government Operations and
Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government Operations and the
Office of the Governor and made publicly available within 10 days of
following completion.
* * *
(d) Policies and limitations.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no member and no
employee of the Commission shall have any direct interest in the gains or
profits of any investment made by the Commission; nor shall any member or
employee of the Commission, directly or indirectly, for the member or
employee personally or as an agent, in any manner use the same except to
make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the
Commission; nor shall any member or employee of the Commission become
an endorser or surety, or in any manner an obligor, for the monies loaned to or
borrowed from the Commission.
(2) The Commission shall formulate policies and procedures deemed
necessary and appropriate to carry out its functions, including a written
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 20 of 34
2026
statement of the responsibilities of and expectations for the Chair of the
Commission and standards of conduct for members and employees of the
Commission in order to maintain and promote public confidence in the
integrity of the Commission. The standard of conduct policies shall prohibit
members and employees from receiving or soliciting any gift, including meals,
alcoholic beverages, travel fare, room and board, or any other thing of value,
tangible or intangible, from any vendor or potential vendor of investment
services, management services, brokerage services, and other services to the
Commission.
* * *
(f) Asset and liability study. Beginning on July 1, 2023, and every three
years thereafter, based on the most recent actuarial valuations of each Plan, the
Commission shall study the assets and liabilities of each Plan over a 20-year
period. The study shall:
(1) project the expected path of the key indicators of each Plan’s
financial health based on all current actuarial and investment assumptions;
current contribution and benefit policies, including the Plans’ mark-to-market
funded ratio; actuarially required contributions by source; payout ratio; and
related liquidity obligations; and
(2) project the effect on each Plan’s financial health resulting from:
(A) possible material deviations from Plan assumptions in investment
assumptions, including returns versus those expected and embedded in the
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 21 of 34
2026
actuary’s estimate of actuarially required contributions and any material
changes in capital markets volatility; and
(B) possible material deviations from key plan Plan actuarial
assumptions, including retiree longevity, potential benefit increases, and
inflation.
* * *
(h) Annual reports.
(1) Beginning on January 15, 2022, and every year thereafter, the
Commission shall submit to the House Committee on Government Operations
and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government Operations:
(A) a report on the performance of each Plan versus its demographic
investment and other actuarial assumptions over a three-, five-, seven-, and 10-
year period and the funding ratio of each Plan to each Plan beneficiary at the
end of each fiscal year; and
(B) a report on the status of the funding and investment performance
of each Plan and any relevant information from the asset liability and scenario
testing completed during the prior fiscal year.
(2) The Commission shall send to each participant or beneficiary of each
Plan a written or electronic copy of the report described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, in the format authorized by the participant or beneficiary. The
report shall be consolidated with any other reports required to be sent by the
Commission to the participants or beneficiaries of each Plan.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 22 of 34
2026
(3) Reports required by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall include
an accounting of receipts, disbursements, and earnings of the State Employees’
Postemployment Benefits Trust Fund established pursuant to section 479a of
this title and the Retired Teachers’ Health and Medical Benefits Fund
established pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 1944b.
(4) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the reports to be made under this subsection.
(i) Securities depository. The Commission shall designate from time to
time a depository for the securities and evidences of indebtedness held in the
Plans and may contract for the safekeeping of securities and evidences of
indebtedness within and outside the State of Vermont in such banks, trust
companies, and safe-deposit facilities as it shall from time to time determine.
The necessary and incidental expenses of such safekeeping and for service
rendered, including advisory services in investment matters, shall be paid from
the operation expenses of the individual Plan as hereinafter provided. Any
agreement for the safekeeping of securities or evidences of indebtedness shall
provide for the access to such securities and evidences of indebtedness, except
securities loaned pursuant to a securities lending agreement as authorized by
subsection (j) of this section, at any time by the custodian or any authorized
agent of the State for audit or other purposes.
(j) Securities lending agreements. The Commission may authorize the loan
of its securities pursuant to securities lending agreements that provide for
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 23 of 34
2026
collateral consisting of cash or securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S.
government or its agencies equal to 100 percent or more of the market value of
the loaned securities. Cash collateral may be invested by the lending
institution in investments approved by the Commission. Approval of
investments shall be made in accordance with the standard of care established
by the prudent investor rule under 14A V.S.A. chapter 9.
Sec. 14. 3 V.S.A. § 524 is amended to read:
§ 524. VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION SPECIAL
FUND
(a) Creation.
(1) There is hereby created the Vermont Pension Investment
Commission Special Fund, administered by the Vermont Pension Investment
Commission, for the purpose of receiving funds transferred to the Commission
pursuant to subsection 522(i) of this title. Monies in the Fund shall be used to
pay expenses associated with carrying out the Commission’s duties.
(2) As used in this section, “Fund” means the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission Special Fund created by this section.
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) any amounts collected and transferred by the three retirement
systems Plans and any individual municipalities that have been allowed to
invest their retirement funds pursuant to subsection 523(a) of this title;
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 24 of 34
2026
(2) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
Assembly; and
(3) any interest earned by the Fund.
Sec. 15. 16 V.S.A. § 1931 is amended to read:
§ 1931. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(23) “Commission” means the Vermont Pension Investment
Commission created by 3 V.S.A. § 522.
Sec. 16. 16 V.S.A. § 1942 is amended to read:
§ 1942. BOARD OF TRUSTEES; MEDICAL BOARD; ACTUARY; RATE
OF CONTRIBUTION; SAFEKEEPING OF SECURITIES
* * *
(o) The Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall designate from
time to time a depository for the securities and evidences of indebtedness held
in the Pension Fund and may contract for the safekeeping of securities and
evidences of indebtedness within and outside the State of Vermont in such
banks, trust companies, and safe-deposit facilities as it shall from time to time
determine, and the necessary and incidental expenses of such safekeeping and
for service rendered, including advisory services in investment matters, shall
be paid from the Pension Fund. Any agreement for the safekeeping of
securities or evidences of indebtedness, except securities loaned pursuant to a
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 25 of 34
2026
securities lending agreement as authorized by subsection (q) of this section,
shall provide for the access to such securities and evidences of indebtedness at
any time by the custodian or any authorized agent of the State for audit or other
purposes. [Repealed.]
* * *
(q) The Vermont Pension Investment Commission may authorize the loan
of its securities pursuant to securities lending agreements that provide for
collateral consisting of cash or securities issued or guaranteed by the United
States government or its agencies equal to 100 percent or more of the market
value of the loaned securities. Cash collateral may be invested by the lending
institution in investments approved by the State Treasurer. Approval of
investments shall be made in accordance with the standard of care. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 17. 16 V.S.A. § 1943 is amended to read:
§ 1943. INVESTMENTS; INTEREST RATE; DISBURSEMENTS;
STANDARDS OF CONDUCT
(a) The members of the Vermont Pension Investment Commission
established in 3 V.S.A. chapter 17 shall be the trustees of the Pension Fund
created by this chapter, and with respect to them may invest and reinvest the
assets of the Pension Fund, and hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and
dispose of the securities and investments in which the assets of the Pension
Fund have been invested and reinvested. Investments shall be made in
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 26 of 34
2026
accordance with the standard of care established by the prudent investor rule
under 14A V.S.A. chapter 9.
(b) The Board from time to time shall set rates of regular interest at such
percentages compounded annually as it determines to be equitable both to
members and to taxpayers of the State, but not less than three percent nor more
than five percent.
(c) The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of the Pension
Fund of the System. All payment from the Pension Fund shall be made by the
Treasurer or by a deputy treasurer, only upon vouchers signed by two persons
designated by the Board. A duly attested copy of a resolution of the Board
designating such persons and bearing on its face specimen signatures of such
persons shall be filed with the State Treasurer as authority for making
payments upon such vouchers. No vouchers shall be drawn unless it has
previously been authorized by resolution of the Board. [Repealed.]
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no trustee and no
employee of the Board or member of the Vermont Pension Investment
Commission shall have any direct interest in the gains or profits of any
investment made by the Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee of the
Board or Commission, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself the trustee
or employee personally or as an agent, in any manner use the same except to
make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the Board or
Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee of the Board or Commission
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 27 of 34
2026
become an endorser or surety, or in any manner an obligor, for the monies
loaned to or borrowed from the Board. The State Treasurer, with the approval
of the Board and the Commission, shall adopt by rule standards of conduct for
trustees and employees of the Board in order to maintain and promote public
confidence in the integrity of the Board. Such rules shall prohibit trustees and
employees from receiving or soliciting any gift, including meals, alcoholic
beverages, travel fare, room and board, or any other thing of value, tangible or
intangible, from any vendor or potential vendor of investment services,
management services, brokerage services, and other services to the Board.
Sec. 18. 16 V.S.A. § 1944b is amended to read:
§ 1944b. RETIRED TEACHERS’ HEALTH AND MEDICAL BENEFITS
FUND
(a) There is established the Retired Teachers’ Health and Medical Benefits
Fund (Benefits Fund) to pay retiree postemployment benefits when due in
accordance with the terms established by the Board of Trustees of the State
Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont pursuant to subsection 1942(p) and
section 1944e of this title. The Benefits Fund is intended to comply with and
be a tax exempt tax-exempt governmental trust under Section 115 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The Benefits Fund shall be
administered by the Treasurer.
* * *
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 28 of 34
2026
(d) The Treasurer may invest monies in the Benefits Fund in accordance
with the provisions of 32 V.S.A. § 434 or, in the alternative, may enter into an
agreement with the Vermont Pension Investment Commission to invest such
monies in accordance with the standards of care established by the prudent
investor rule under 14A V.S.A. § 902, in a manner similar to the
Commission’s investment of retirement system monies. Interest earned shall
remain in the Benefits Fund, and all balances remaining at the end of a fiscal
year shall be carried over to the following year. The Treasurer’s annual
financial report to the Governor and the General Assembly shall contain an
accounting of receipts, disbursements, and earnings of the Benefits Fund.
* * *
Sec. 19. 24 V.S.A. § 5062 is amended to read:
§ 5062. RETIREMENT BOARD; MEDICAL BOARD; ACTUARY; RATES
OF CONTRIBUTION; SAFEKEEPING OF SECURITIES
* * *
(m) The Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall designate from
time to time a depository for the securities and evidences of indebtedness held
in the Fund of the System and may contract for the safekeeping of securities
and evidences of indebtedness within and without the State of Vermont in such
banks, trust companies, and safe-deposit facilities as it shall from time to time
determine. The necessary and incidental expenses of such safekeeping and for
service rendered, including advisory services in investment matters, shall be
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 29 of 34
2026
paid from the operation expenses of the System as hereinafter provided. Any
agreement for the safekeeping of securities or evidences of indebtedness shall
provide for the access to such securities and evidences of indebtedness, except
securities loaned pursuant to a securities lending agreement as authorized by
subsection (o) of this section, at any time by the custodian or any authorized
agent of the State for audit or other purposes. [Repealed.]
* * *
(o) The Vermont Pension Investment Commission may authorize the loan
of its securities pursuant to securities lending agreements that provide for
collateral consisting of cash or securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S.
government or its agencies equal to 100 percent or more of the market value of
the loaned securities. Cash collateral may be invested by the lending
institution in investments approved by the State Treasurer. Approval of
investments shall be made in accordance with the standard of care established
by the prudent investor rule under 9 V.S.A. chapter 147. [Repealed.]
Sec. 20. 24 V.S.A. § 5063 is amended to read:
§ 5063. INVESTMENTS; INTEREST RATE; DISBURSEMENTS
* * *
(e) Except as otherwise herein provided, no trustee and no employee of the
Retirement Board or Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall have any
direct interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the
Commission, nor shall any trustee, member of the Commission, or employee
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 30 of 34
2026
of the Board or Commission, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself the
trustee or employee personally or as an agent, in any manner use the same
except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the
Board or Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee of the Board or
Commission become an endorser or surety, or in any manner an obligor, for
monies loaned to or borrowed from the Board.
* * * Pension Credits * * *
Sec. 21. 16 V.S.A. § 1944 is amended to read:
§ 1944. VERMONT TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT FUND
* * *
(b) Member contributions.
* * *
(12)(A) Any Group A or Group C member may elect to have included in
the member’s creditable service years of service during which the member
exercised his or her the member’s option not to be a member of the System.
Any member who so elects shall deposit in the Pension Fund by a single
contribution an amount computed at regular interest to be sufficient to provide
at normal retirement an annuity equal to one and two-thirds or two percent,
whichever is applicable pursuant to section 1937 of this title, of the member’s
average compensation multiplied by the number of years of service for which
the member elects to receive credit.
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 31 of 34
2026
(B)(i) Prior to receiving a retirement allowance, any Group A or
Group C member who is elected to serve as the president of an employee
organization designated as the exclusive bargaining representative for
employees in this chapter may elect to have included in the member’s
creditable service a year during which they received no creditable service due
to serving as the employee organization president with full release from
employment responsibilities to a qualifying System employer, provided that on
behalf of any member who so elects, the employee organization shall deposit
in the Pension Fund an amount computed at regular interest to be sufficient to
provide at normal retirement an annuity equal to one and two-thirds or two
percent, whichever is applicable pursuant to section 1937 of this title, of the
member’s average final compensation.
(ii) Any purchase under this subdivision (B) shall be completed
and payment received by the System on or before June 30 for each year of
service purchased.
(iii) It shall be the responsibility of the employee organization to
initiate each purchase with the System.
* * *
Sec. 22. 24 V.S.A. § 5054a is amended to read:
§ 5054a. ELECTIVE CREDITS
* * *
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 32 of 34
2026
(d)(1) Prior to receiving a retirement allowance, any Group A, B, or C
member who is elected to serve as the president of an employee organization
designated as the exclusive bargaining representative for employees in this
chapter may elect to have included in the member’s creditable service a year
during which they received no creditable service due to serving as the
employee organization president with full release from employment
responsibilities to a qualifying System employer, provided that on behalf of
any member who so elects, the employee organization shall deposit in the
Pension Fund an amount determined by the System’s actuary to be cost neutral
to the System.
(2) Any purchase under this subsection shall be completed and payment
received by the System on or before June 30 for each year of service
purchased.
(3) It shall be the responsibility of the employee organization to initiate
each purchase with the System.
* * * Capital Debt * * *
Sec. 23. 32 V.S.A. § 1001 is amended to read:
§ 1001. CAPITAL DEBT AFFORDABILITY ADVISORY COMMITTEE
* * *
(c) Committee estimate of a prudent amount of net State tax-supported
debt; affordability considerations. On or before September 30 of each year, the
Committee shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly the
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 33 of 34
2026
Committee’s estimate of net State tax-supported debt that prudently may be
authorized for the next fiscal year, together with a report explaining the basis
for the estimate. The Committee’s estimate shall not take into consideration
the balance remaining at the end of each fiscal year in the subaccounts of the
Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments, established pursuant to
section 1001b of this title. The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of
required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.
In developing its annual estimate, and in preparing its annual report, the
Committee shall consider:
* * *
(4) The criteria that recognized bond rating agencies use to judge the
quality of issues of State bonds, including:
(A) existing and projected total debt service on net tax-supported
debt as a percentage of combined General and Transportation Fund revenues,
excluding surpluses in these revenues that may occur in an individual fiscal
year;
(B) existing and projected total net tax-supported debt outstanding as
a percentage of total State personal income;
(C) existing and projected pension and other postemployment benefit
liability metrics; and
VT LEG #390203 v.1

No. 131 Page 34 of 34
2026
(D) other metrics at the Committee’s discretion adopted by
recognized bond rating agencies, including long-term liabilities not covered in
subdivisions (A)–(C) of this subdivision (4).
* * *
(11) The capital asset depreciation ratio reflecting unfunded capital
maintenance costs Measures reflecting the remaining useful life of State
infrastructure and the potential for future capital maintenance and replacement
costs.
* * *
Sec. 24. [Deleted.]
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 25. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, except that:
(1) this section and Sec. 7 (Pension and Benefits Funding Task Force)
shall take effect on passage; and
(2) Sec. 3 (unclaimed property expenses and service charges sunset)
shall take effect on January 1, 2040.
Date Governor signed bill: June 15, 2026
VT LEG #390203 v.1